Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Right to Dissent

48-231-201. Right to dissent.

A member of an LLC is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of the fair value, as determined under § 48-231-206, of the member's membership interests in the event of, any of the following LLC actions:

Consummation of a plan of merger to which the LLC is a party;

Consummation of a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the LLC not made in the usual or regular course of its business, but not including a disposition in dissolution described in § 48-245-501(d), or a disposition pursuant to an order of a court, or a disposition for cash on terms requiring that all or substantially all of the net proceeds of disposition be distributed to the members in accordance with their respective membership interests within one (1) year after the date of disposition;

Except as provided in the articles or operating agreement in effect when the person becomes a member or placed in such agreement without the opposing vote of the member, an amendment of the articles or operating agreement that materially and adversely affects the rights or preferences of the membership interests of the dissenting member because it:

Alters or abolishes a preferential right of the membership interests;

Alters or abolishes a preemptive right of the owner of the membership interests to make a contribution;

Excludes or limits the right of a member to vote on a matter, or to cumulate votes, except as the right may be excluded or limited through the acceptance of contributions or the making of contribution agreements pertaining to membership interests with similar or different voting rights; or

Establishes or changes the conditions for or consequences of expulsion;

An amendment to the articles or operating agreement that materially and adversely affects the rights or preferences of the membership interests of the dissenting member because it:

Changes a member's right to resign or retire; or

Alters or abolishes a right in respect of the redemption of the membership interests, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase of such membership interests;

Any other LLC action taken pursuant to a member vote to the extent the articles, the operating agreement, or a resolution approved by the members provides that dissenting members are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their membership interests.

A member entitled to dissent and obtain payment for such member's membership interest under this chapter may not challenge the LLC action creating such member's entitlement unless the action is unlawful or fraudulent with respect to the member or the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-202. Notice of dissenters' rights.

If proposed LLC action creating dissenters' rights under § 48-231-201 is submitted to a vote at a members' meeting, the meeting notice must state that members are or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this chapter and be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

If LLC action creating dissenters' rights under § 48-231-201 is taken without a vote of the members, the LLC shall notify in writing all members entitled to assert dissenters' rights that the action was taken and send them the dissenters' notice described in § 48-231-204.

An LLC's failure to give notice pursuant to this section will not invalidate the LLC action.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-203. Notice of intent to demand payment.

If proposed LLC action creating dissenters' rights under § 48-231-201 is submitted to a vote at a members' meeting, a member who wishes to assert dissenters' rights:

Must deliver to the LLC, before the vote is taken, written notice of such member's intent to demand payment for such member's membership interest if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Must not vote such member's membership interest in favor of the proposed action. No such written notice of intent to demand payment is required of any member to whom the LLC failed to provide the notice required by § 48-231-202.

A member who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) is not entitled to payment for such member's membership interest under this chapter.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-204. Dissenters' notice.

If proposed LLC action creating dissenters' rights under § 48-231-201 is authorized at a members' meeting, the LLC shall deliver a written dissenters' notice to all members who satisfied the requirements of § 48-231-203.

The dissenters' notice must be sent no later than ten (10) days after the LLC action was authorized by the members or effectuated, whichever is the first to occur, and must:

State where the payment demand must be sent;

Supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of the first announcement to news media or to members of the principal terms of the proposed LLC action and requires that the person asserting dissenters' rights certify whether or not the member acquired membership interest before that date;

Set a date by which the LLC must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than one (1) nor more than two (2) months after the date required in subsection (a) is delivered; and

Be accompanied by a copy of this chapter, if the LLC has not previously sent a copy of this chapter to the member pursuant to § 48-231-202.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-205. Duty to demand payment.

A member sent a dissenters' notice described in § 48-231-204 must demand payment and certify whether the member acquired the membership interest before the date required to be set forth in the dissenters' notice pursuant to § 48-231-204(b)(2).

The member who demands payment under subsection (a) retains all other rights of a member until these rights are cancelled or modified by the effectuation of the proposed LLC action.

A member who does not demand payment by the date set in the dissenters' notice is not entitled to payment for such member's membership interest under this chapter.

A demand for payment filed by a member may not be withdrawn unless the LLC with which it was filed, or the surviving LLC, consents to such withdrawal.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-206. Payment.

Except as provided in § 48-231-208, as soon as the proposed LLC action is effectuated, or upon receipt of a payment demand, whichever is later, the LLC shall pay each dissenter who complied with § 48-231-205 the amount the LLC estimates to be the fair value of such dissenter's partnership interest, plus accrued interest.

The payment must be accompanied by:

The LLC's balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

A statement of the LLC's estimate of the fair value of the membership interests;

An explanation of how the value of the membership interest was calculated;

A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under § 48-231-209; and

A copy of this chapter, if the LLC has not previously sent a copy of this chapter to the member pursuant to § 48-231-202 or § 48-231-204.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-207. Failure to take action.

If the LLC does not effectuate the proposed action that gave rise to the dissenters' rights within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment, it must send a new dissenters' notice under § 48-231-203 and repeat the payment demand procedure if it effectuates the proposed action.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-208. After-acquired membership interests.

An LLC may elect to withhold payment required by § 48-231-206 from a dissenter unless the dissenter was a member before the date set forth in the dissenters' notice as the date of the first announcement to news media or to members of the principal terms of the proposed LLC action.

To the extent the LLC elects not to withhold payment under subsection (a), after effectuating the proposed LLC action, it shall estimate the fair value of the membership interest, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of the dissenter's demand. The LLC shall send with its offer a statement of its estimate of the fair value of the membership interest, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under § 48-231-209.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-231-209. Procedure if member dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A dissenter may notify the LLC in writing of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of such dissenter's membership interest and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate (less any payment under § 48-231-206), or reject the LLC's offer under § 48-231-208 and demand payment of the fair value of membership interest and interest due, if:

The dissenter believes that the amount paid under § 48-231-206 or offered under § 48-231-208 is less than the fair value of such dissenter's membership interest or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated; or

The LLC fails to make payment under § 48-231-206 within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment.

A dissenter waives the right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the LLC of such dissenter's demand in writing under subsection (a) within one (1) month after the LLC made or offered payment for such dissenter's membership interest.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.